Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
415A

PROFESSIONAL
CORPORATION ACT

Section

415A-1 Title

415A-2 Definitions

415A-3 Purposes

415A-4 Prohibited activities

415A-5 General powers

415A-6 Rendering professional services

415A-7 Right of corporation to acquire its own
shares

415A-8 Corporate name

415A-8.5 Administrative order of abatement for
infringement of

corporate name

415A-9 Issuance and transfer of shares; share
certificates

415A-10 Death or disqualification of a shareholder

415A-11 Responsibility for professional services

415A-12 Professional relationships; privileged
communications

415A-13 Voting of shares

415A-14 Directors and officers

415A-14.5 Incorporators

415A-14.6 Articles of incorporation

415A-14.7 Filing of documents, effective date

415A-14.8 Organization of corporation

415A-15 Amendments to articles of incorporation

415A-16 Merger and share exchange

415A-16.5 Conversion into and from professional
corporations

415A-16.6 Articles of conversion

415A-16.7 Repealed

415A-16.8 Effect of conversion

415A-17 Termination of professional activities

415A-18 Administrative dissolution; expiration; reinstatement

415A-18.5 Trustees or receivers for dissolved
professional

corporations; appointment; powers; duties

415A-19 to 21 Repealed

415A-22 Annual report

415A-23 Repealed

415A-24 Interrogatories by director

415A-25 Penalties

415A-26 Repealed

415A-27 Application of business corporation act

415A-28 Application to existing corporations

415A-29 Reservation of power

415A-30 Effect of repeal of prior acts

415A-31 Effect of invalidity of part of this
chapter

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next